Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-119
Annexation; extraterritorial property use; continuation.

Any extraterritorial zoning regulations, property use regulations, or other laws, codes, rules, or regulations imposed upon any annexed lands by a city of the first class before such annexation shall continue in full force and effect until otherwise changed.

Laws 1967, c. 64, § 3, p. 214;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 3.